New York, session 2025-2026, S231.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "graduate 2 outreach assistance law". 3 § 2. Paragraph 3 of subsection (a) of section 605 of the tax law, as 4 added by chapter 28 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 5 (3) Accounting methods. (A) A taxpayer's method of accounting under 6 this article shall be the same as [his] the taxpayer's method of 7 accounting for federal income tax purposes, with the exception of the 8 provisions of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph. In the absence of any 9 method of accounting for federal income tax purposes, New York taxable 10 income shall be computed under such method as in the opinion of the tax 11 commission clearly reflects income. 12 (B) For the purpose of computing New York taxable income, a taxpayer 13 shall not be required to include in such computation the first two 14 hundred fifty thousand dollars, with a cap of fifty thousand dollars per 15 taxable year, the taxpayer earns following graduation from any college 16 or university having attained a four-year degree or higher, or the first 17 one hundred fifty thousand dollars, with a cap of twenty-five thousand 18 dollars per taxable year, the taxpayer earns following graduation from 19 any college or university having attained a two-year degree. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to taxa- 21 ble years beginning the first of January following the effective date of 22 this act. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00882-01-5